Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-107
Drainage improvements; survey; plat; estimate of work required.

If the county board shall find for the improvement, it shall cause to be entered on its journal an order directing the county surveyor, or an engineer, to go upon the line described in the petition, or as changed by the board in accordance with section 31-106; to survey and level the same and set a stake at every hundred feet, numbering downstream; to note the intersection of section lines, road crossings, boundary lines, precinct and county lines; to make a report, profile and plat of the same; and to estimate the number of cubic yards for each working section as hereinafter provided.

Laws 1881, c. 51, § 7, p. 238;

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 7, p. 455;

R.S.1913, § 1724;

C.S.1922, § 1671;

C.S.1929, § 31-107;

R.S.1943, § 31-107.

The county is authorized to employ an engineer, and the county, not petitioners, is liable. Holmvig v. Dakota County, 90 Neb. 576, 134 N.W. 166 (1912); State ex rel. Sullivan v. Ross, 82 Neb. 414, 118 N.W. 85 (1908).

Where a survey and plat of engineer is confirmed, it is deemed to be that of board. Dodge County v. Acom, 61 Neb. 376, 85 N.W. 292 (1901).